Utah statutes.
57-23-4.   Exclusions.

This chapter does not apply to:

(1)  an interest in real estate regulated under Title 57, Chapter 19, Timeshare and Camp Resort Act;

(2)  an offering for an interest in real estate which is regulated under:

(a)  Title 61, Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Securities Act;

(b)  the securities laws of any state; or

(c)  federal securities laws; or

(3)  a sale of manufactured housing licensed under Title 58, Chapter 56, Utah Uniform Building Standards Act, unless the sale is made in conjunction with an offering or sale of a cooperative interest under this chapter.

